Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Mental Health Service System

33-6-101. Applicability of title to persons with mental illness and serious emotional disturbance.

Services to persons with mental illness and serious emotional disturbance are governed generally by this title, including chapters 1-4, 7, 8 and 9.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-6-102. Development of system — Purpose.

The department shall maintain a system to assure the most appropriate and effective services for publicly funded service recipients.

Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; T.C.A., § 33-2-601; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§ 33-6-102 to 33-6-106 are compatible with the Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act (EMTALA), 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd, regardless of whether or not an examination takes place at a facility that provides in-patient mental health treatment, and, therefore, there is no federal preemption, OAG 01-078, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (5/8/01).

T.C.A. §§ 33-6-102 to 33-6-106 do not conflict with the settlement agreement in a case in the U.S. District Court for the Middle District of Tennessee as the settlement agreement applied to the TennCare program and its contractors, rather than to general state law, OAG 01-078, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (5/8/01).

33-6-103. Priority population — Standards of care — Funding — Legislative intent — Contract with licensed community mental health agency.

The department shall identify adults with severe disabling mental illness and children with serious emotional disturbance.

Persons described in subsection (a) are a priority population for the department's mental health services and supports. The department shall set the array of services and supports for this priority population annually in its plan. The state will fund and the department will maintain the array of services and supports for persons in this priority population. Consistent with applicable eligibility requirements, the state may provide the funding for the services through the medicaid program or any waiver granted under the medicaid program, specifically including TennCare, other public funds, or private funds.

It is the legislative intent that the department of mental health and substance abuse services maintain the funding amount and the extent of services of the behavioral health safety net of the state at least at the annualized levels provided as of January 1, 2009. In the event that appropriations to the department are not sufficient to continue funding these critical services at a level at least equivalent to the services being provided as of January 1, 2009, then the department shall provide a report to the planning and policy council created by § 33-1-401 and the fiscal review committee created by § 3-7-101. The report shall identify all means the department intends to use to increase resources available.

The department may contract with any licensed community mental health agency for the provision of services under the behavioral health safety net, as long as the community mental health agency is able to sufficiently demonstrate to the department that the community mental health agency is able to provide to individuals who will be served under the behavioral health safety net all of the behavioral health services that are included within adult behavioral health services for the seriously and persistently mentally ill, as defined in § 71-5-103.

Acts 1994, ch. 861, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., § 33-1-208; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2002, ch. 730, § 30; 2009, ch. 95, § 3; 2010, ch. 1100, § 45; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2020, ch. 578, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding the behavioral health safety net of Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 95.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 578, § 2. July 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The general sessions court has jurisdiction over services provided to mentally ill persons on an involuntary basis, beginning with their transportation and involuntary admission for diagnosis, evaluation, and treatment of mental illness, and continuing through their discharge, OAG 00-172, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (11/8/00).

A law enforcement officer may transport persons in custody to a physician, doctoral level psychologist, or certain other medical professionals designated by the commissioner, for immediate examination and certification for care and treatment, OAG 00-172, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (11/8/00).

The sheriff is primarily responsible for the transportation of a person who has been certified in need of inpatient care and treatment and must be transported to a hospital or treatment resource for admission, OAG 00-172, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (11/8/00).

Transportation that occurs after a person has been transported to a hospital or treatment resource where the person is proposed to be admitted is the responsibility of the personnel of the hospital or treatment resource, OAG 00-172, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (11/8/00).

The entity responsible for transporting persons with mental illness must provide transportation services 24 hours per day, OAG 00-172, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (11/8/00).

33-6-104. Community-based screening process — Prescreening agents.

The department shall maintain a community-based screening process designed to provide alternatives to hospitalization, minimize length of confinement, promote speedy return to the community, and maximize each service recipient's ability to remain in a community setting.

As part of the system the commissioner shall designate individuals to serve as mandatory prescreening agents. The commissioner may base designation on criteria consistent with § 33-6-427 and may set limits on an agent's authority. The commissioner may decline to designate a person who satisfies the requirements of § 33-6-427. The commissioner may remove authority as a mandatory pre-screening agent from a person without cause. Designation of a person as a mandatory prescreening agent does not vest any property right, and limitations on authority and removal of designation as a mandatory prescreening agent are not governed by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, or by title 8, chapter 30.

An agent has only the authority designated by the commissioner and, if the agent is not a physician, the authority of the agent terminates if the person no longer satisfies § 33-6-427. An agent's authority is valid in connection with hospitalization of a privately funded person at a private hospital or treatment resource only if the private hospital or treatment resource files notice of acceptance of the designated person's authority with the commissioner.

When performing the duties authorized by this section an individual agent shall be considered to be a state employee pursuant to § 8-42-101(3)(D). When performing the duties authorized by this section an individual agent shall not be considered as an employee of such agent's regular employer, and the agent's regular employer, whether public or private, shall not be held liable in any damages to any person or government entity in a civil action for injury, death or loss to person or property that allegedly results from the actions of the individual agent while acting as a state employee pursuant to this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 377, § 3; 2002, ch. 730, § 31; 2010, ch. 633, § 1.

33-6-105. Certificate of need required for admission of publicly funded person — Psychiatric emergency services — Funding for services for uninsured persons.

A person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance shall not be involuntarily admitted or committed to a state owned or operated hospital or treatment resource under chapter 6, part 4, of this title unless a mandatory prescreening agent provides one of the certificates for each set of certificates of need required by §§ 33-6-309, 33-6-404 and 33-6-408. If a mandatory pre-screening agent cannot examine the person within two (2) hours of the request to examine the person, then a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist with health service provider designation may examine the person and may provide one of the certificates if the physician or psychologist, in consultation with a member of a crisis response service designated by the commissioner to serve the county, determines that all available less drastic alternatives to placement in a hospital or treatment resource are unsuitable to meet the needs of the person.

To the extent that funds are made available and in the interest of public safety, the department of mental health and substance abuse services shall coordinate with other departments and agencies of state government, community mental health centers and other health care providers to promote access to a continuum of appropriate services for persons in psychiatric emergencies, including, but not limited to, the following components:

A toll-free telephone number for twenty-four-hour access, seven (7) days a week. The telephone line shall be linked to an appropriate psychiatric emergency service provider staffed by qualified personnel in order to provide crisis triage and intervention;

Telephone and walk-in triage screening, telephone and mobile or walk-in face-to-face clinical assessment, intervention and follow-up; and

Access to crisis respite and crisis stabilization beds.

It is the legislative intent that the department of mental health and substance abuse services maintain funding for the portion of the emergency psychiatric services continuum for persons in need of such services who are not eligible for the TennCare program and are otherwise uninsured. In the event that appropriations to the department are not sufficient to fully support this portion of the emergency psychiatric services continuum, at least at the annualized levels provided as of January 1, 2009, then the department shall provide a report to the planning and policy council created by § 33-1-401 and the fiscal review committee created by § 3-7-101. The report shall identify all means the department intends to use to continue to make resources available.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 32; 2009, ch. 404, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 1100, § 45; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to “publicly funded or potentially publicly funded persons” is consistent with stated purpose and with federal policy and case law requiring that treatment occur in the least restrictive environment; thus, there is a rational relationship to a legitimate governmental interest and there is no violation of provider nondiscrimination obligations under TennCare or other provider contracts, OAG 01-078, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (5/8/01).

33-6-106. Persons not meeting admission criteria.

If a mandatory prescreening agent performs the initial evaluation of a person for admission and determines that the person does not meet admission criteria, the mandatory prescreening agent shall assure that the person has alternative services available and offered if appropriate. The mandatory prescreening agent shall contact the person within twelve (12) hours to determine outcome and complete follow-up as necessary. If the prescreening is performed by a physician or psychologist as authorized by § 33-6-105, the crisis response service shall contact the person within twelve (12) hours to determine outcome and complete follow-up as necessary.

Transportation to and admission of a person to a state owned or operated hospital or treatment resource shall not begin until a mandatory prescreening agent or physician or psychologist as authorized by § 33-6-105 completes a certificate of need.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 33.

33-6-107. Treatment review committees.

All inpatient providers of mental health services shall have treatment review committees to make decisions for service recipients who are admitted to inpatient facilities and lack capacity under § 33-3-218 as determined under rules adopted under § 33-3-217 to make decisions for themselves on treatment, release of information to other qualified mental health professionals, other treatment agencies, providers, or a family member, and getting information from other treatment agencies or providers.

The treatment review committee shall be composed of at least four (4) members. No one who is a member of a service recipient's treatment team may be a member of the treatment review committee. The treatment review committee should include a licensed physician, a service recipient advocate, and two (2) who are qualified mental health professionals, licensed pharmacists, or clinical chaplains. A treatment review committee that considers treatment for a physical condition or illness must include a physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner. The treatment review committee shall encourage service recipients who are sixteen (16) years of age or older and the conservator or surrogate decision maker on behalf of a service recipient who is sixteen (16) years of age or older to participate with the treatment review committee to the extent possible. The treatment review committee shall make every effort to obtain the participation of parents, legal custodian, or legal guardian in the meeting if the service recipient is a child and not emancipated. The service recipient's family members, legal custodian, legal guardian, conservator, or attorney-in-fact under a durable power of attorney for health care may attend the meeting.

The treatment review committee shall not override a decision by a parent, legal custodian, or legal guardian of a service recipient who is an unemancipated child, or a conservator of a service recipient.

A person committed involuntarily to a hospital or treatment resource who does not lack capacity to make a decision on treatment may be given treatment over the service recipient's objection only if the service recipient's treatment review committee approves the treatment.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 34; 2004, ch. 565, § 9; 2005, ch. 150, § 2.

33-6-108. Admissions to a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all admissions or transfers to a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource shall be subject to available suitable accommodations, as defined in § 33-1-101, and no admission to a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource shall occur until the department has designated the state-owned or operated facility as having available suitable accommodations; provided, that if there are no suitable available accommodations at the time of the determination, then the commissioner shall expeditiously find a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource to accommodate the person upon the availability of suitable available accommodations.

Acts 2009, ch. 531, § 36.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

33-6-109. Quarterly report on the implementation and impact of available suitable accommodations.

The department shall report quarterly to the health committee of the house of representatives, the health and welfare committee of the senate, and the finance, ways and means committees of both the house of representatives and the senate on the implementation and the impact of available suitable accommodations, including the number and length of any delayed admissions.

Acts 2009, ch. 531, § 57; 2013, ch. 236, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.